sl-SI: Toleranca induktivnosti: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Drugo
bg-BG: Толеранс на индуктивността: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Други
ja: インダクタンス許容誤差: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; その他
th: ความคลาดเคลื่อนความเหนี่ยวนำ: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; อื่นๆ
it: Tolleranza dell'induttanza: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Altro
ro-RO: Toleranță inductanță: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Altele
nb: Induktans toleranse: -20 / +80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Annet
sk-SK: Tolerancia indukčnosti: -20/+80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Iné
da: Induktanstolerance: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Andet
pt-PT: Tolerância de indutância: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Outro
pl: Tolerancja indukcyjności: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Inne
ko: 인덕턴스 허용 오차: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; 기타
hr-HR: Tolerancija induktiviteta: - 20 % / + 80 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 15 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 3 %; ± 5 %; Ostalo
hu: Induktivitás-tűréshatár: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tolerância de indutância: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Outro
es: Tolerancia de inductancia: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Otros
fi: Induktanssin toleranssi: -20/+80%; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3%; ±5 %; Muu
fr: Tolérance d’inductance: -20/+80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Autre
en: Inductance tolerance: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Other
zh-TW: 電感公差: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; 其他
ru: Допуск индуктивности: -20/+80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Другой
sv: Induktanstolerans: -20/+80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Övrigt
zh-CN: 电感容差: -20/+80%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; 其他
el: Ανοχή επαγωγής: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Άλλο
nl: Inductantie tolerantie: -20/+80 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 15 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 3 %; ± 5 %; Andere
tr: Endüktans toleransı: -20/%+80; %±0.5; %±1; %±10; %±15; %±2; %±20; %±3; %±5; Diğer
cs: Tolerance indukčnosti: −20 % / +80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Jiné
vi: Dung sai điện cảm: -20/+80%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±3%; ±5%; Khác
de: Induktivitätstoleranz: –20 %/+80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Induktyvumo tolerancija: –20 / +80 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±3 %; ±5 %; Kita